Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
[OLD] GENERAL PROVISIONS

§§323-1 to 7.8 REPEALED. L 1989, c
327, §11.

[PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS]

§323-1 Contracts with territories and
possessions of the United States. The governor is authorized to enter into
and execute contracts in the name of the State with territories, possessions,
and other areas in the Pacific Ocean region that are under the jurisdiction of
the United States, regarding the use of health and public or private
correctional facilities of the State on a space available basis; provided that
any such contract shall provide for the payment of costs to the State. [L 1989,
c 327, §10; am L 1998, c 227, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next